Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 9. Personnel and Labor Relations.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska railroad labor relations agency, see 3 AAC 93.

Sec. 42.40.705.
Political activities.

Money, assets, or property of the corporation may not be used for political activities. However, board members and employees may communicate with and appear before committees of Congress, the state legislature, and municipal governing bodies in connection with matters directly affecting the corporation.

A board member or employee who violates the provisions of this section is personally subject to a civil penalty assessed by a judge of the superior court in an amount not to exceed $5,000. An action to enforce this section may be brought by any person.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.710.
Corporation employees.

Employees of the Alaska Railroad are employees of the corporation and not of the state. However, employees of the corporation shall be treated as employees of the state for the purposes of AS 39.52. The provisions of AS 39, other than AS 39.52, do not apply to employees of the corporation.

Except as provided in this subsection, employees of the corporation are covered by AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

(Alaska Wage and Hour Act). If the terms of a collective bargaining agreement that was mutually agreed upon by an organization representing train or engine service employees and the corporation so provide, AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

do not apply to train or engine service employees to the extent set out in the collective bargaining agreement.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am § 4 ch 87 SLA 1986; am § 102 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 2001)

Sec. 42.40.720.
Collective bargaining rights.

The provisions of AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

(Public Employment Relations Act) do not apply to the corporation or to its employees.
However, employees who are not executive officers may organize and form, join, or assist an organization to engage in collective bargaining through representatives of their own choosing and engage in concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.730.
Railroad labor relations agency.

The Alaska labor relations agency, established in AS

23.05.360

, is the sole railroad labor relations agency.

The Alaska labor relations agency shall carry out the provisions of AS

42.40.730

—

42.40.890

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am E.O. No. 77 § 4 (1990))

Sec. 42.40.740.
Collective bargaining unit.

The railroad labor relations agency shall decide in each case, in order to ensure employees the fullest freedom in exercising the rights guaranteed by AS

42.40.710

—

42.40.890

the unit appropriate for the purposes of collective bargaining, based on such factors as community of interest, wages, hours, and other working conditions of the employees involved, the history of collective bargaining, and the desires of the employees.
Bargaining units shall be as large as is reasonable, and unnecessary fragmenting shall be avoided.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For certification, see 8 AAC 97, art. 1.

Sec. 42.40.750.
Representatives and elections.

The railroad labor relations agency shall investigate a petition if it is submitted in a manner prescribed by the railroad labor relations agency by

an employee or group of employees or an organization acting in their behalf alleging that 30 percent of the employees of a proposed bargaining unit

want to be represented for collective bargaining by a labor or employee organization as exclusive representative; or

assert that the organization that has been certified or is currently being recognized by the corporation as bargaining representative is no longer the representative of the majority of employees in an appropriate unit; or

the corporation alleging that one or more organizations have presented to it a claim to be recognized as a representative of a majority of employees in an appropriate unit.

If the railroad labor relations agency has reasonable cause to believe that a question of representation exists, it shall provide for a hearing upon due notice. If the railroad labor relations agency finds that there is a question of representation, it shall direct an election by secret ballot to determine whether or by which organization the employees desire to be represented and shall certify the results of the election. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the waiving of hearings by stipulation for the purpose of a consent election in conformity with the regulations of the railroad labor relations agency or an election in a bargaining unit agreed upon by the parties.

The railroad labor relations agency shall determine who is eligible to vote in an election held under this section and shall adopt regulations governing the election. In an election in which none of the choices on the ballot receives a majority of the votes cast, a runoff election shall be conducted, the ballot providing for selection between the two choices receiving the largest number of valid votes cast in the election. If an organization receives the majority of the votes cast in the election, it shall be certified by the railroad labor relations agency as exclusive representative of all the employees in the bargaining unit. An election may not be held in a bargaining unit or in a subdivision of a bargaining unit if a valid election has been held within the preceding 12 months.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits recognition of an organization as the exclusive representative by the corporation by mutual consent.

An election may not be directed by the railroad labor relations agency in a bargaining unit in which there is in force a valid collective bargaining agreement, except during a 90-day period preceding the expiration date. However, a collective bargaining agreement may not bar an election upon petition of employees in the bargaining unit if

the petitioners are not parties to the agreements; and

more than three years have elapsed since the execution of the agreement or its last timely renewal, whichever was later.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am § 24 ch 23 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For certification, see 8 AAC 97, art. 1.

For procedure for hearings, see 8 AAC 97, art. 5.

Sec. 42.40.760.
Unfair labor practices.

The corporation or its agent may not

interfere, restrain, or coerce an employee in the exercise of the rights guaranteed in AS

42.40.720

;

dominate or interfere with the formation, existence, or administration of an organization;

discriminate in regard to hire or tenure of employment or a term or condition of employment to encourage or discourage membership in an organization;

discharge or discriminate against an employee because the employee has signed or filed an affidavit, petition, or complaint or given testimony under AS

42.40.710

—

42.40.890

;

refuse to bargain collectively in good faith with an organization that is the exclusive representative of employees in an appropriate unit, including the discussing of grievances with the exclusive representative.

Nothing in AS

42.40.710

—

42.40.890

prohibits the corporation from making an agreement with an organization to require as a condition of employment

membership in the organization that represents the unit on or after the 30th day following the beginning of employment or on the effective date of the agreement, whichever is later; or

payment by the employee to the exclusive bargaining agent of a service fee to reimburse the exclusive bargaining agency for the expense of representing the members of the bargaining unit.

An organization or its agents may not

restrain or coerce

an employee in the exercise of the rights guaranteed in AS

42.40.720

; or

the corporation in the selection of a representative for the purposes of collective bargaining or the adjustment of grievances;

refuse to bargain collectively in good faith with the corporation, if it has been designated in accordance with AS

42.40.710

—

42.40.890

as the exclusive representative of employees in an appropriate unit.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For certification, see 8 AAC 97, art. 1.

For unfair labor practices, see 8 AAC 97, art. 2.

For right of nonassociation, see 8 AAC 97, art. 4.

Sec. 42.40.770.
Investigation and conciliation of complaints.

If a verified written complaint by or for a person claiming to be aggrieved by a practice prohibited by AS

42.40.760

or a written accusation that a person subject to AS

42.40.710

—

42.40.890

has engaged in a prohibited practice, is filed with the railroad labor relations agency, it shall investigate the complaint or accusation. If it determines after a preliminary investigation that probable cause exists in support of the complaint or accusation, it shall try to eliminate the prohibited practice by informal methods of conference, conciliation, and persuasion.
Nothing said or done during this endeavor may be used as evidence in a subsequent proceeding.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For unfair labor practices, see 8 AAC 97, art. 2.

Sec. 42.40.780.
Complaint and accusation.

If the railroad labor relations agency fails to eliminate the prohibited practice by conciliation and to obtain voluntary compliance with AS

42.40.710

—

42.40.890

or before it attempts conciliation, it may serve a copy of the complaint or accusation upon the respondent. The complaint or accusation and the subsequent procedures shall be handled in accordance with the administrative adjudication portion of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For unfair labor practices, see 8 AAC 97, art. 2.

For procedure for hearings, see 8 AAC 97, art. 5.

Sec. 42.40.790.
Orders and decisions.

If the railroad labor relations agency finds that a person named in the written complaint or accusation has engaged in a prohibited practice, the railroad labor relations agency shall issue and serve on the person an order or decision requiring the person to cease and desist from the prohibited practice and to take affirmative action that will carry out the provisions of AS

42.40.710

—

42.40.890

.
If the railroad labor relations agency finds that a person named in the complaint or accusation has not engaged or is not engaging in a prohibited practice, the railroad labor relations agency shall state its findings of fact and issue an order dismissing the complaint or accusation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For procedure for hearings, see 8 AAC 97, art. 5.

Sec. 42.40.800.
Enforcement by injunction.

The railroad labor relations agency may apply to the superior court in the judicial district in which the prohibited practice occurred for an order enjoining the prohibited acts specified in the order or decision of the railroad labor relations agency.
Upon showing by the railroad labor relations agency that the person has engaged or is about to engage in the practice, an injunction, restraining order, or other order that is appropriate may be granted by the court and shall be without bond.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.810.
Power to investigate and compel testimony.

For the purpose of the investigations, proceedings, or hearings that the railroad labor relations agency considers necessary to carry out AS

42.40.710

—

42.40.890

, the railroad labor relations agency may issue subpoenas requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of relevant evidence.

The railroad labor relations agency may administer oaths, examine witnesses, and receive evidence.

The attendance of witnesses and the production of evidence may be required from any place in the state at any designated place of hearing.

If a person refuses to obey a subpoena issued under AS

42.40.710

—

42.40.890

, the superior court in the district in which the person resides or is found may, upon application by the railroad labor relations agency, issue an order requiring the person to comply with the subpoena.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For procedure for hearings, see 8 AAC 97, art. 5.

Sec. 42.40.820.
Regulations.

The railroad labor relations agency shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to carry out AS

42.40.710

—

42.40.890

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For right of nonassociation, see 3 AAC 93, art. 5.

For certification, see 8 AAC 97, art. 1.

For unfair labor practices, see 8 AAC 97, art. 2.

For impasse, see 8 AAC 97, art. 3.

For right of nonassociation, see 8 AAC 97, art. 4.

For procedure for hearings, see 8 AAC 97, art. 5.

For collective bargaining agreement, see 8 AAC 97, art. 6.

Sec. 42.40.830.
Penalty for violation of order or decision.

A person who violates a provision of an order or decision of the railroad labor relations agency is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than $500.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.840.
Mediation.

If, after a reasonable period of negotiation over the terms of a collective bargaining agreement, an impasse as determined by the railroad labor relations agency exists between the corporation and an organization, the railroad labor relations agency shall appoint a person mutually agreeable to the parties from a list of seven qualified mediators or arbitrators knowledgeable in railway labor agreements to act as mediator in the dispute.

Before the determination of an impasse under this section, the parties may also select a mediator by mutual consent.

It shall be the function of the mediator to bring the parties together to effectuate a settlement of the dispute, but neither the mediator nor the railroad labor relations agency has any power of compulsion in mediation proceedings.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For impasse, see 8 AAC 97, art. 3.

Sec. 42.40.850.
Strikes.

Following a decision by the mediator to end the mediation proceedings, employees of a collective bargaining unit may engage in a strike for a limited time if a majority of the employees in that collective bargaining unit vote by secret ballot to do so. The limit of the strike is determined by the interest of the health, safety, or welfare of the public.

The corporation may apply to the superior court in the judicial district in which the strike is occurring for an order enjoining the strike. A strike may not be enjoined unless it can be shown that it has begun to threaten, or is about to threaten, the health, safety, or welfare of the public. A court, in deciding whether to enjoin the strike, shall consider the total equities in the particular case, including the impact of a strike on the public and the extent to which an employee organization and the corporation have met their statutory obligations.

If an impasse or deadlock still exists after the issuance of an injunction, the parties shall submit the dispute to binding arbitration. The railroad labor relations agency shall appoint an arbitrator selected by the parties by mutual consent. If the parties are unable to agree on an arbitrator, the railroad labor relations agency shall appoint an arbitrator from a list of arbitrators knowledgeable in railroad labor agreements. The arbitrator shall fashion the award the arbitrator considers equitable.

Notwithstanding (a) — (c) of this section, an organization and the corporation may mutually agree to submit a dispute to binding arbitration at any time.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am § 12 ch 43 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For impasse, see 8 AAC 97, art. 3.

Sec. 42.40.860.
Agreements.

The Department of Administration may participate in labor negotiations between the corporation and an organization. The corporation may seek advice of the Department of Administration before entering into a collective bargaining agreement concerning wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment. However, the final decision regarding collective bargaining agreements shall be made by the board.

Upon the completion of negotiations between an organization and the corporation, if a settlement is reached, the corporation shall reduce it to writing in the form of an agreement. The agreement shall include a grievance procedure that shall have binding arbitration as its final step. Either party to the agreement has a right of action to enforce the agreement by petition to the railroad labor relations agency.

The parties to an agreement under this section may agree to terms that specify an expiration date for the agreement.

Notwithstanding any provision of AS

42.40.710

—

42.40.890

to the contrary, an agreement between the corporation and an employee bargaining organization that does not contain benefit provisions at least as beneficial to the employee as those provided by AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.550

shall be considered to contain the benefit provisions of those statutes.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am § 10 ch 96 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2002, in subsection (d), “AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.550

” was substituted for “AS

23.10.500

— 23.10.550” to reflect the 2002 renumbering of AS

23.10.500

— 23.10.550.

Administrative Code. —

For unfair labor practices, see 8 AAC 97, art. 2.

For collective bargaining agreement, see 8 AAC 97, art. 6.

Sec. 42.40.870.
Organization dues and employee benefits; deduction and authorization.

Upon written authorization of an employee within a bargaining unit, the corporation shall deduct from the payroll of the employee the monthly amount of dues, fees, and other employee benefits as certified by the secretary of the exclusive bargaining representative and shall deliver it to the chief fiscal officer of the exclusive bargaining representative.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.880.
Exemption.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

42.40.870

, a collective bargaining settlement reached, or agreement entered into, under AS

42.40.860

that incorporates union security provisions, including a union shop or agency shop provision or agreement, shall safeguard the rights of nonassociation of employees having bona fide religious convictions based on tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of which an employee is a member.
Upon submission of proper proof of religious conviction to the railroad labor relations agency, the agency shall declare the employee exempt from becoming a member of an organization.
The employee shall pay an amount of money equivalent to regular organization dues, initiation fees, and assessments to the organization.
Nonpayment of this money subjects the employee to the same penalty as if it were nonpayment of dues.
The receiving organization shall contribute an equivalent amount of money to a charity of its choice not affiliated with a religious, labor, or employee organization.
The organization shall submit to the railroad labor relations agency proof of contribution.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For right of nonassociation, see 3 AAC 93, art. 5.

For right of nonassociation, see 8 AAC 97, art. 4.

Sec. 42.40.885.
Prohibited acts.

The corporation or an employee may not directly or indirectly

require or coerce an employee to participate in any way in any activity or undertaking unless the activity or undertaking is related to the performance of official duties;

require or coerce an employee to make any report concerning an activity or undertaking of the employee unless the activity or undertaking is related to the performance of official duties;

except as directly related to the performance of official duties, require or coerce an employee to submit to an interrogation, examination, or psychological test that is designed to elicit information concerning

a personal relationship with a person connected with the employee by blood or marriage;

the employee’s religious beliefs or practices;

sexual matters;

the employee’s political affiliation or philosophy;

coerce an employee to invest or contribute earnings in any manner or for any purpose;

restrict or attempt to restrict after-working-hour statements, pronouncements, or other activities, not otherwise prohibited by law or personnel rule, of an employee, if the employee does not purport to speak or act in an official capacity.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not diminish the authority of an authorized law enforcement agency to conduct criminal investigations of employees suspected of being involved in criminal activity or to investigate other activity directly related to official railroad business.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.890.
Definitions for AS 42.40.710 — 42.40.890.

In AS

42.40.710

—

42.40.890

,

“election” means a proceeding conducted by the labor relations agency in which the employees in a collective bargaining unit cast a secret ballot for collective bargaining representatives, or for any other purpose specified in AS

42.40.710

—

42.40.890

;

“organization” means a labor or employee organization of any kind in which employees participate and that exists for the primary purpose of dealing with the corporation concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, and conditions of employment;

“railroad labor relations agency” means the Alaska labor relations agency established in AS

23.05.360

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am E.O. No. 77 § 5 (1990))